District of Columbia statutes.
10-306

Repealed

Establishment of Recreation Assistance Board.

Repealed.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 7, 42 DCR 452
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 20(c), 43 DCR 530
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(l), 46 DCR 1355
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(k), 57 DCR 181
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-356, § 4, 58 DCR 760
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, §§ 259(b) and 304(b), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 10-303.
1981 Ed., § 8-306.
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote subsec. (a)(6), which had as follows: “(6) The Executive Director of the District of Columbia Sports Commission; and”
D.C. Law 18-356 rewrote subsec. (a)(6), which formerly read:
“(6) The Chief Executive Officer and General Manager of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority; and”
Section 259(b) of D.C. Law 20-271 repealed this section; Section 304(b) of D.C. Law 20-271 purported to amend the repealed section.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-266 rewrote subsec. (a)(6) to read as follows:
“(6) The President and Chief Executive Officer of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority; and”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 18-266 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-301.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(l) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
Section 6 of D.C. Act 13-25 provides for the application of the act.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(l) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(k) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(k) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Washington Convention and Sports Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-504, July 30, 2010, 57 DCR 7578).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Washington Convention and Sports Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-580, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10113).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 259(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 304(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 259(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 304(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the Department of Recreation and Parks shall be known as the Department of Parks and Recreation.